Hawaii statutes.
§414D-248 Grounds for administrative
dissolution. The department director may commence a proceeding under
section 414D-249 to administratively dissolve a corporation if the corporation
fails to:

(1) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(2) File its annual report for a period of two years;

(3) Appoint and maintain an agent for service of
process as required; or

(4) File a statement of a change in the name or
business address of the agent as required under chapter 425R. [L 2001, c 105,
pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §60; am L 2003, c 124, §32; am L 2009, c 55, §22]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next